Washington statutes.
RCW 43.61.070

Payments to veterans' organizations—Approval by director of veterans affairs.

Payments to any veterans' organization shall first be approved by the director of veterans affairs and insofar as possible shall be made on an equitable basis for work done.

[1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 115 s 24; 1970 ex.s. c 18 s 36; 1965 c 8 s 43.61.070. Prior: 1947 c 110 s 7; RRS s 10758-106.]

NOTES:

Construction—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 115: See RCW 43.60A.907.

Effective date—Severability—1970 ex.s. c 18: See notes following RCW 43.20A.010.